New York, session 2025-2026, S741.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (xv) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 2 section 922 of the real property tax law, as added by a chapter of the 3 laws of 2024 amending the real property tax law relating to the payment 4 of real property and school district taxes in installments, as proposed 5 in legislative bills numbers S. 3604-A and A. 7813-A, is amended to read 6 as follows: 7 (xv) notwithstanding any general, special or local law to the contra- 8 ry, if [the owner has elected to pay] the taxes set forth in the state- 9 ment are payable in installments[, pursuant to this article,] such 10 statement shall clearly disclose the due dates for payment of such 11 [installment payments] installments without interest or penalties. 12 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 974 of the real property tax law, as 13 amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the real property tax 14 law relating to the payment of real property and school district taxes 15 in installments, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 3604-A and 16 A. 7813-A, is amended to read as follows: 17 2. [a.] Such statement shall recite that such owner may elect, pursu- 18 ant to section nine hundred seventy-five of this [chapter] title, to pay 19 the taxes set forth in the statement in installments, as provided in the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02671-01-5 S. 741 2 1 local law enacted by the county pursuant to section nine hundred seven- 2 ty-two of this [chapter] title. 3 [b. If the owner has elected to pay the taxes set forth in the state- 4 ment in installments, pursuant to this article,] In addition, such 5 statement shall clearly disclose the due dates for payment of such 6 [installment payments] installments without interest and penalties 7 [shall be clearly disclosed on the statement outlined in subdivision one 8 of this section]. 9 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 1338 of the real property tax law, as 10 amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the real property tax 11 law relating to the payment of real property and school district taxes 12 in installments, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 3604-A and 13 A. 7813-A, is amended to read as follows: 14 2. [a.] Such statement shall recite that such owner may elect, pursu- 15 ant to section thirteen hundred forty of this [chapter] article, to pay 16 the taxes set forth in the statement in installments as provided in the 17 local law enacted by the county pursuant to section nine hundred seven- 18 ty-two of this chapter. 19 [b. If the owner has elected to pay the taxes set forth in the state- 20 ment in installments, pursuant to this article,] In addition, such 21 statement shall clearly disclose the due dates for payment of such 22 [installment payments] installments without interest and penalties 23 [shall be clearly disclosed on the statement outlined in subdivision one 24 of this section]. 25 § 4. Section 4 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the real 26 property tax law relating to the payment of real property and school 27 district taxes in installments, as proposed in legislative bills numbers 28 S. 3604-A and A. 7813-A, is amended to read as follows: 29 § 4. This act shall take effect [immediately] on the one hundred twen- 30 tieth day after it shall have become a law. 31 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 32 have been in full force and effect on and after September 27, 2024; 33 provided however, that sections one, two and three of this act shall 34 take effect on the same date and in the same manner as a chapter of the 35 laws of 2024 amending the real property tax law relating to the payment 36 of real property and school district taxes in installments, as proposed 37 in legislative bills numbers S. 3604-A and A. 7813-A.